District of Columbia statutes.
35-401

Repealed

Passenger motor vehicles for hire to carry insurance; exceptions; liability of insurance company absolute.

Repealed.

June 29, 1938, 52 Stat. 1233, ch. 809, § 1
Dec. 15, 1942, 56 Stat. 1051, ch. 734
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 952, Pub. L. 85-792, § 2
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 22(a), 33 DCR 703
1981 Ed., § 44-301.
1973 Ed., § 44-301.